Louisiana, session 2026, HB1178.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 51:1260(C)(5)(hh) and (ii) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1260. Major Events Incentive Fund; Major Events Incentive Program
* * *
C. As used in this Section, the following terms have the following meanings:
* * *
(5) "Qualified major event" means any event, and any activities related to or
associated with the event, including but not limited to the following:
* * *
(hh) The French Quarter Festival
(ii) The Fried Chicken Festival
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1568 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1178